Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.(2) "Financial aid" means either loans, grants, or both, to students who demonstrate financial need enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of higher education.(3) "Institutions of higher education" means the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College.(4) "Regional universities" means Western Washington University at Bellingham, Central Washington University at Ellensburg, and Eastern Washington University at Cheney.(5) "State college" means The Evergreen State College in Thurston county.(6) "State universities" means the University of Washington and Washington State University.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The pay it forward program is created to provide greater access to higher education. To be eligible to participate in the program, a student must be enrolled in a graduate degree program at an institution of higher education. Participants shall sign a binding contract to make contributions to the pay it forward program beginning one year following graduation or discontinuation of their graduate degree program.(2) In developing and administering the program, the council shall:(a) Provide funds to participants for tuition and fees, less any awards received through state financial aid;(b) Deposit participant contributions into the pay it forward trust fund account created in section 3 of this act. In determining the amount and length of time participants contribute to the program, the council shall apply the following criteria:(i) Participants who attended a state university may not be required to contribute more than five percent of their income;(ii) Participants who attended a regional university or state college may not be required to contribute more than 3.5 percent of their income;(iii) Participants must make contributions in proportion to the number of credits for which the participant was registered while participating in the pay it forward program; and(iv) Participants may not be required to make contributions to the pay it forward program for a period longer than 15 years.(3) Participants are eligible to receive pay it forward tuition assistance for up to four years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of four years, or up to 125 percent of the published length of time of their program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The pay it forward trust fund account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure that all disbursements from the account are made available to students eligible for the pay it forward program created in section 2 of this act.(2) The council shall deposit in the account all money received for the program established under section 2 of this act. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the program, contributions to the pay it forward program by participants, and private contributions, including principal and interest. Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the council may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes of the pay it forward program.(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for the pay it forward program according to program rules and policies.(4) Only the executive director of the council or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.--- END ---